California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
When a minor is adjudged a ward of the juvenile court and committed to a county juvenile home, ranch, camp, or forestry camp, the juvenile work furlough administrator may, if he concludes that such person is a fit subject therefor, direct that such person be permitted to continue in his regular employment, if that is compatible with the requirements of Section 928, or may authorize the person to secure employment for himself in the county, unless the court at the time of commitment has ordered that such person not be granted work furloughs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

927.

(a) If the juvenile work furlough administrator so directs that the minor be permitted to continue in his or her regular employment, the administrator shall arrange for a continuation of that employment when possible without interruption. If the minor does not have regular employment, and the administrator has authorized the minor to secure employment for himself or herself, the minor may do so, and the administrator may assist the minor in doing so. Any employment so secured must be suitable for the minor and must be at a wage at least as high as the prevailing wage for similar work in the area where the work is performed and in accordance with the prevailing working conditions in the area. In no event may any employment be permitted where there is a labor dispute in the establishment in which the minor is, or is to be, employed.

(b) If the minor does not have regular employment, the juvenile work furlough administrator may authorize the minor to apply for placement in a local job training program, and the administrator may assist him or her in doing so. The program may include, but shall not be limited to, job training assistance as provided through the Job Training Partnership Act (Public Law 97-300; 29 U.S.C.A. Sec. 1501 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 48, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

928.

Whenever the minor is not employed and between the hours or periods of employment, he shall be confined in a juvenile detention facility unless the court or administrator directs otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

929.

The earnings of the minor shall be collected by the juvenile work furlough administrator, and it shall be the duty of the minor’s employer to transmit such wages to the administrator at the latter’s request. Earnings levied upon pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 706.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall not be transmitted to the administrator. If the administrator has requested transmittal of earnings prior to levy, such request shall have priority. When an employer transmits such earnings to the administrator pursuant to this section the employer shall have no liability to the minor for such earnings. From such earnings the administrator shall pay the minor’s board and personal expenses, both inside and outside the juvenile detention facility, and shall deduct so much of the costs of administration of this article as is allocable to such minor. If sufficient funds are available after making the foregoing payments, the administrator may, with the consent of the minor, pay, in whole or in part, the preexisting debts of the minor. Any balance shall be retained until the minor’s discharge and thereupon shall be paid to the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 181.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

930.

In the event the minor violates the conditions laid down for his conduct, custody, or employment, the juvenile work furlough administrator may order termination of work furloughs for such minor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 27. 24-Hour Schools [940. - 945.]

940.

The board of supervisors in every county may provide and maintain, at the expense of the county, in a location approved by the judge of the juvenile court, or in counties having more than one judge of the juvenile court, by the presiding judge of the juvenile court, a 24-hour school or a nonresidential boot camp school program operated by the probation officer. The school shall be established to provide education and training for minors in accordance with the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 48600) of Chapter 4 of Part 27 of the Education Code. The cost of providing education and training for the students shall be computed pursuant to the provisions of Section 893.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 72, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

941.

The 24-hour school or a nonresidential boot camp school program shall be under the management and control of the probation officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 72, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

942.

The board of supervisors shall provide for a suitable superintendent to have charge of the 24-hour school, and for such other employees as may be needed for its efficient management, and shall provide for payment, out of the general fund of the county, of suitable salaries for such superintendent and other employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1542.)
-------------------------------------------

943.

The superintendent and other employees of the 24-hour school shall be appointed by the probation officer, pursuant to a civil service or merit system, and may be removed, for cause, pursuant to such system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1542.)
-------------------------------------------

944.

The probation officer shall keep a classified list of expenses for the operation of the 24-hour school and shall file a duplicate copy with the county board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1542.)
-------------------------------------------

945.

A 24-hour school shall be considered a children’s institution for licensing purposes and shall be licensed by the department of social welfare of the county in which the 24-hour school is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1542.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 28. Adjustment Schools [960. - 987.]

960.

This article shall be construed in conformity with the intent as well as the expressed provisions thereof, and the governing board of any adjustment school may do all those lawful acts that it deems necessary to promote the prosperity of the adjustment school, or to promote the well-being and education of all minors entrusted to its charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

961.

The terms and provisions of Article 25 (commencing with Section 900) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 and Section 579 shall, so far as applicable, govern and control proceedings under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

962.

The boards of supervisors or other governing bodies of counties and cities and counties may organize, establish, equip, and maintain, including the purchase of suitable sites and the construction of suitable buildings, adjustment schools in each county or city and county for the purpose of furnishing to minors under the age of 18 years pursuant to this article, care, custody, education, training, and adjustment to good citizenship, which shall be continuous and uninterrupted during the period the minors remain in school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

963.

The boards of supervisors of two or more counties may by regularly adopted resolutions or ordinances duly entered on the minutes or proceedings of their respective boards, unite in the organization, establishment, equipment, and maintenance of adjustment schools for the respective counties. In that event, the schools shall be located in one or more of the counties as shall be mutually agreed upon and designated in the resolutions or ordinances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

964.

If adjustment schools are organized by only one county or city and county, the government and management shall be vested in a governing board which shall be either the board of education, or similar school governing body, or the county probation committee of the juvenile court, or a board of trustees composed of seven members selected from both the board of education and the probation committee, as may be determined or chosen in the exercise of sound discretion by the board of supervisors or other governing body of the county or city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

965.

If the adjustment schools are organized by the joint action of two or more counties, the boards of supervisors of the counties may by concerted action by duly adopted resolutions entrust the government and management to a governing board, which shall be any of the following:

(a) The board of education of the county in which at least one adjustment school is located.

(b) The probation committee of the juvenile court of the county in which at least one adjustment school is located.

(c) A board of trustees composed of seven members who shall represent all of the counties and each of whom may be selected from either the county board of education or the probation committee of the juvenile court of his or her respective county as shall be determined in the joint resolutions of the boards of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

966.

If a board of trustees is chosen to govern and manage the adjustment school the term of office of the trustees shall be six years, except that of the seven trustees first selected, two shall hold office for two years, two shall hold office for four years, and three shall hold office for six years. Each of the two-, four-, and six-year terms shall be assigned by lot to each of the seven trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

967.

The governing board shall make all needful rules and regulations for the transaction of business and for the management and government of the adjustment school under its jurisdiction, and it shall see that proper care, custody, education, and training are provided for the minors under its care, to the end that the minors shall be adjusted to good citizenship and prepared to become honorable, self-supporting members of society.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

968.

The governing board shall make all contracts for the organization, establishment, including the purchase of a suitable site and the construction of suitable buildings, equipment, operation, and maintenance of the adjustment school that may be necessary or advisable. In no event shall the amount of money appropriated for any such purpose or other limitation prescribed by law or by order of the governing board, be exceeded or violated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

969.

No member of the governing board, nor officer, nor employee of any adjustment school shall be interested, personally, directly, or indirectly, in any contract, purchase, or sale made, or in any business carried on in behalf of the school. Any money paid on the contracts or sales may be recovered by a civil suit, and the governing board upon the proof of such interest shall remove from office immediately the member, officer, or employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

970.

The governing board of the adjustment school shall appoint a superintendent, not of its own number, who shall be a person qualified by training and experience for the character of work to be performed at the adjustment school, and who shall hold office at the pleasure of the governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

971.

The governing board shall determine the number, title, duties, and terms of office of all other officers and employees and shall fix their salaries, and that of the superintendent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

972.

The superintendent of the adjustment school shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, make and file with the governing board an oath that he or she will faithfully and impartially discharge his or her duties. The superintendent shall also file with the governing board a bond, running to the State of California in a sum the board may determine, and with sureties to be approved by the board, conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties. The premium of the bond shall be a part of the cost of maintaining the adjustment school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

973.

The superintendent, after making and filing the bond, shall, subject to the direction of the governing board, be invested with the custody of the lands, buildings, and all other property pertaining to or under the control of the adjustment school. The superintendent shall account to the governing board in the manner it may require for all property entrusted to the superintendent and for all money received by him or her as superintendent of the adjustment school, or for any of the minors entrusted to its care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

974.

The superintendent shall also, subject to the direction of the governing board, appoint all officers and employees of the adjustment school, who shall hold office at the pleasure of the superintendent. The superintendent shall exercise the supervisory, executive, and managing powers that are conferred upon him or her by the governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

975.

The superintendent shall reside in the adjustment school or one of the adjustment schools under his or her jurisdiction and shall be furnished suitable quarters, furniture, food supplies, and laundry for himself or herself and his or her family. The governing board may make similar provision for other officers and employees that the interests of the adjustment school may in its judgment require to reside on the premises.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

976.

The adjustment school shall receive into its care, custody, and control all boys and girls under 18 years of age who are committed to it by order of the juvenile court of the county or city and county maintaining or contributing to the maintenance of the adjustment school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

977.

Any minor who has been committed to the care, custody, and control of any adjustment school shall remain in the school for the duration of the period provided in the order of commitment, or until further order of the juvenile court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

978.

The juvenile court shall review the order of commitment at least once each year, and upon review the court may continue, terminate, or modify the order of commitment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

979.

If at any time in the opinion of the superintendent of the adjustment school the further detention of the minor is detrimental to the interests of the school, the minor may immediately, upon order of the superintendent, be returned to the committing court, and the court may revoke its previous order, and proceedings may be resumed where they were suspended when the commitment was made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

980.

The governing board of any adjustment school shall cause the school to be conducted as may seem best calculated to carry out the intentions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

981.

There shall be organized a course of study, corresponding as far as practicable with the course of study in the public schools of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

982.

There shall be provided in the adjustment school the proper facilities and equipment for vocational and trade training, in addition to other public school education or training that may be determined upon by the governing board. Vocational or trade training education shall be given to each minor while under the care of the adjustment school, to the end that he or she may upon discharge be qualified for honorable and self-supporting employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

983.

Any order of the juvenile court committing a minor to the care, custody, and control of an adjustment school may provide the expense of his or her support and maintenance by directing that the expense be paid in whole or in part by his or her parent, guardian, or other person liable for his or her support and maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

984.

If the adjustment school is organized, established, equipped, and maintained by only one county or city and county, the entire expense of the school shall be borne by the county or city and county, and the board of supervisors, or other governing body of the county or city and county shall make due and annual provision therefor. The necessary items of expense shall be set forth in the annual budget of the county or city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

985.

If an adjustment school is organized, established, equipped, and maintained by two or more counties, the initial expense of organizing, establishing, and equipping the school shall be apportioned between each of the counties on a pro rata basis in the ratio that the number of children of school age residing in each county bears to the number of children of school age residing in all of the counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

986.

The annual expense of maintaining the school by two or more counties, shall be apportioned between the counties on a pro rata basis in the ratio that the average daily enrollment of minors placed in the school from each county during the preceding year bears to the total average daily enrollment in the school from all of the counties during the year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------

987.

The governing board shall require any officer entrusted with money belonging to an adjustment school or to any of the minors entrusted to its care, or any officer placed in a position of trust and responsibility in the custody of property or in the handling of supplies belonging to the school, to file with the board a bond with sureties approved by the board and in a sum that it may determine, conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties required, and upon the faithful accounting of all money and property coming into his or her hands or under his or her control by virtue of his or her office. The premiums on the bonds shall be a part of the cost of maintaining the adjustment school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 534.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Juvenile and Gang Violence Prevention, Detention, and Public Protection Act of 1998 [990. - 993.]

990.

As used in this article:

(a) “Acquiring” means obtaining ownership of an existing facility in fee simple for use as a youth center.

(b) “Altering” or “renovating” means making modifications to an existing facility that are necessary for cost-effective use as a youth center, including restoration, repair, expansion, and all related physical improvements.

(c) “Applicant” means
 a nonprofit agency that serves youth, including, but not limited to, organizations such as Boys and Girls Clubs, YMCA, Girl Scouts, Boy Scouts, Camp Fire, Inc., California 4-H Programs, the California Police Activities League, and camping organizations that have been operating in California for a period of not less than two years. An applicant does not have to be operating in the county of application in order to be a qualified applicant.

(d) “Constructing” means the purchase or building of a new facility, including the costs of land acquisition and architectural and engineering fees.

(e) “Department” means the Department of the Youth Authority.

(f) “Nonprofit organization” means an agency or organization that serves youth that is exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is owned and operated
 by one or more corporations or associations with no part of the net earnings benefiting any private shareholder or individual.

(g) “Programs” means services and activities provided in a youth center, including, but not limited to, recreation, health and fitness, citizenship and leadership development, job training, delinquency prevention such as antigang programs, teen pregnancy prevention programs, and counseling for problems such as drug and alcohol abuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 59, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

991.

Moneys in the fund, up to twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), upon appropriation to the department, shall be available for allocation by the department in accordance with this chapter, for grants to nonprofit organizations for acquiring, renovating, or constructing youth centers. Of these moneys, an amount not to exceed 112 percent thereof shall be available to the department for administrative costs associated with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 499, Sec. 2.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

992.

(a) The department shall, upon appropriation pursuant to Section 993.3, make grants to nonprofit organizations for the purpose of acquiring, renovating, or constructing youth centers. This article shall not apply to agencies or institutions under the jurisdiction of the department prior to the operative date of this section.

(b) A nonprofit organization receiving a grant for the acquisition of a facility to be used as a youth center shall agree that the facility will be used for that
 purpose for at least 10 years from the date of acquisition.

(c) A nonprofit organization receiving a grant for renovation of an existing facility to be used as a youth center shall agree that the facility will be used for that purpose for at least 10 years.

(d) A nonprofit organization receiving a grant for the construction of a facility to be used as a youth center shall agree that the facility will be used for that purpose for at least 20 years after completion of construction.

(e) Prior to the grant award, and as a condition to receipt of the award, the nonprofit organization shall execute and deliver a promissory note to the department in a form approved by the department. The amount of the note shall be the amount of the grant, reduced proportionately for each year of compliance as set forth in subdivisions (b),
 (c), and (d). The department shall have a lien on any facility construction, acquired, renovated, or remodeled under this act for the period of time described in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d). The lien shall be evidenced by a deed of trust or other suitable recordable document approved by the department. This subdivision shall not apply when the department determines that application of its provisions is not in the best interests of the public.

(f) Should any of the following events occur, the department may, without the consent of the Department of General Services, foreclose upon the lien, take possession of and sell the property:

(1) The owner of the facility ceases to be a nonprofit organization.

(2) The facility is no longer used for youth center activities.

(g) A facility altered, acquired, renovated, or constructed using funds allocated under this article may not be used and may not be intended to be used for sectarian instruction or as a place for religious worship.

(h) The Director of the Youth Authority, prior to issuing a request for proposal under this article, shall create an advisory committee. This advisory committee shall advise the director on the request for proposal and on the criteria for reviewing and evaluating the responses. The department shall not issue a request for proposal for acquiring, renovating, or constructing youth centers any later than three months after the moneys are deposited in the fund for the purpose of this chapter. The advisory committee shall consist of representatives, including, but not limited to, representatives from statewide nonprofit youth organizations, local government, probation and law enforcement, and community-based nonprofit
 organizations serving youth or youth related issues. Any local chapter, branch, group, or other entity within an organization shall not be eligible for funding under this article if a representative of the organization serves on the advisory committee and that representative is a member of the particular chapter, branch, group, or other entity within the larger organization that is applying for the funds.

The department shall review and evaluate proposals from applicants for funding. The proposals shall be consistent with the criteria developed by the department following consultation with the advisory committee.

(i) Proposals from an applicant for youth center funding shall do all of the following:

(1) Document the need for the applicant’s proposal.

(2) Contain a written
 commitment and a plan for the delivery of programs, including, where appropriate, plans for innovative nontraditional programs designed to meet the needs of the youth of the targeted community.

(3) Contain a match for funding that meets the following:

(A) Equal to 15 percent of the total amount requested.

(B) Match is in cash or in kind.

(4) Document the cost effectiveness of the proposal.

(5) Contain a written commitment and plan to develop and implement a process to receive and consider feedback and suggestions from the community served including a separate mechanism for the youth it serves. A board of directors reflecting broad representation of the community shall satisfy the
 requirement for community input.

(6) Document plans to utilize and coordinate availability of the youth center facilities with other organizations serving the same youth population and, where possible, when the facilities are not being utilized for youth activities, to maximize utilization by other community organizations, including, but not limited to, senior groups and crime victims’ and crime prevention organizations.

(j) The department shall rank the proposals received for funding on a priority consideration based on established greatest need, the number of youths that can be served, the most underserved areas, and the most economically disadvantaged areas, both in urban and rural counties. The department shall also evaluate the cost effectiveness of the proposal, the nonprofit organization’s experience in programs serving youth, and the proposed utilization of, and
 coordination with, other agencies serving youth.

(k) The department shall, to the extent possible, and giving consideration to the amount of funds available, attempt to ensure a broad distribution of the funds consistent with the program priorities, in order to meet the needs of the youth in the state.

(l) The department shall consider any protest or objection regarding the award of a contract grant, whether submitted before or after the grant award, as long as the protest is filed within the time period established in the request for proposal. All protests or objections shall be made in writing. The protesting party shall be notified by the department in writing of the final decision on the protest. The notification shall set forth the rationale upon which the decision is based.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 499, Sec. 2.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

993.

(a) No grant made pursuant to this chapter shall exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000) and each grant shall reflect the reasonable costs for acquisition and construction of a facility, taking into consideration its location, size, and proposed use.

(b) In a youth center facility that is acquired, renovated, or constructed in conjunction with other groups, funds received under this article may support only the following:

(1) That part of the facility used by qualifying youth.

(2) A proportionate share of the costs based on the extent of use of the facility by qualifying youth.

(c) Facilities shall be acquired, renovated, or constructed not later than three years from the date of any grant awarded unless the time is extended, for good cause, by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 499, Sec. 2.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Institutions for Delinquents [1000. - 1258.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment and General Government [1000. - 1020.]

1000.

Commencing July 1, 2005, any reference to the Department of the Youth Authority refers to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, which has jurisdiction over all educational training and treatment institutions now or hereafter established and maintained in the state as correctional schools for the reception of wards of the juvenile court and other persons committed to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 10, Sec. 72.   Effective May 10, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 99 of Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.1.

In order to provide counties with alternative placement options, the Department of the Youth Authority is authorized to establish, maintain, or facilitate the development of regional centers, which may be available on a contract basis to counties for the placement of wards. The regional centers, depending on the services needed, may provide, but are not limited to, the following: mental health programs, short-term incarceration and treatment services, and boot camp programs. This section shall not be interpreted to prohibit counties from jointly developing regional centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 452, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.5.

Where in any law of this State the name “Whittier State School” appears it shall hereafter be understood to mean and shall be construed to refer to Fred C. Nelles School for Boys.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 155.5 by Stats. 1943, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.7.

As used in this chapter, “Youth Authority,” “authority,” and “the authority” mean and refer to the Department of the Youth Authority, and “board” means and refers to the Youth Authority Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 372.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.

The general government and supervision of each such institution is vested in the Youth Authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.5.

(a) Except when authorized by law, or when authorized by the person in charge of an institution or camp administered by the Youth Authority, or by an officer of the institution or camp empowered by the person in charge of the institution or camp to give that authorization, any person who knowingly brings or sends into, or who knowingly assists in bringing into, or sending into, any institution or camp, or the grounds belonging to any institution or camp, administered by the Youth Authority, or any person who, while confined in the institution or camp knowingly possesses therein, any controlled substance, the possession of which is prohibited by Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code; any alcoholic beverage; any
 firearm, weapon or explosive of any kind; or any tear gas or tear gas weapon shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(b) Except as otherwise authorized in the manner provided in subdivision (a), any person who knowingly uses tear gas or uses a tear gas weapon in any institution or camp specified in subdivision (a) is guilty of a felony.

(c) This section shall not be construed to preclude or in any way limit the applicability of any other law proscribing a course of conduct also proscribed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 618.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.7.

Every person who, having been previously convicted of a felony and confined in any state prison in this state, without the consent of the officer in charge of any California Youth Authority institution comes upon the grounds of any such institution, or lands belonging or adjacent thereto, in the nighttime, and who refuses or fails to leave upon being requested to do so by an employee of the institution, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.

The Youth Authority may do all lawful acts which it deems necessary to effectuate the purposes for which such schools are established, and to promote the well-being, education and reformation of the inmates thereof; but the authority shall not incur any indebtedness in excess of the moneys appropriated or otherwise made available for the use of such schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.

The authority shall have charge of the land, buildings, apparatus, tools, stock, provisions and other property belonging to each such institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

1004.

The authority shall have charge of the persons committed to or confined in each such institution, and shall provide for their care, supervision, education, training, employment, discipline, and government. It shall exercise its powers toward the correction of their faults, the development of their characters, and the promotion of their welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.

The land purchased for the site of Preston School of Industry shall be used exclusively for the occupancy and purposes of the school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

1009.

The Department of the Youth Authority may order the return of nonresident persons committed to the department or confined in institutions or facilities subject to the jurisdiction of the department to the states in which they have legal residence. Whenever any public officer, other than an officer or employee of the department, receives from any private source any moneys to defray the cost of that transportation, he or she shall immediately transmit the moneys to the department. All moneys, together with any moneys received directly by the department from private sources for transportation of nonresidents, shall be deposited by the department in the State Treasury, in augmentation of the current appropriation for the support of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 5.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1009.1.

When, pursuant to Section 1009, money is received by the Department of the Youth Authority from private sources to defray the cost of transportation for the return of a nonresident committed to it and the nonresident is not returned or the money received exceeds the cost of such transportation, the department shall refund to such private sources such money or such excess money, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 60.)
-------------------------------------------

1009.2.

The fiscal officer of the Department of the Youth Authority shall make payment of any refund pursuant to Section 1009.1 if the Director of the Youth Authority prepares a voucher which sets forth the facts which pertain to the refund and authorizes its payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 60.)
-------------------------------------------

1009.3.

If any money which is to be refunded has been deposited in the State Treasury, the State Controller, upon receipt of a claim which is filed by the Department of the Youth Authority, shall draw his warrant for the payment of the refund from the fund to which the money was credited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 60.)
-------------------------------------------

1009.4.

If the Director of the Youth Authority finds that the amount of any refund is less than three dollars ($3), he may retain such amount, unless demand for the payment of such refund is made within six months after the determination that a refund is due. If such demand is made, the refund shall be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 60.)
-------------------------------------------

1010.

In determining residence for purposes of transportation, a person who has lived continuously in this State for a period of one year and who has not acquired a residence in another State by living continuously therein for at least one year subsequent to his residence in this State shall be deemed to be a resident of this State. Time spent in a public institution or on parole therefrom shall not be counted in determining the matter of residence in this or another State. In determining the residence of a ward of the juvenile court committed to the Youth Authority or confined in any institution under its jurisdiction, due consideration shall be given to the residence of the parents of such ward, and if either one or both parents of the ward are residents of this State the ward shall also be deemed a resident of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

1011.

All expenses incurred in returning these persons to other states shall be paid by this state, but the expense of returning residents of this state shall be borne by the states making the returns.

The cost and expense incurred in effecting the transportation of these persons shall be paid from the funds appropriated for that purpose, or, if necessary, from the money appropriated for the care of these persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 320, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1015.
